District of Columbia statutes.
42-3405.09

Judicial review.

(a)

After the issuance of a final decision and order pursuant to this chapter, and within 15 days after the Mayor has notified the parties of the final decision and order, any party to such proceeding may seek judicial review of such decision and order by filing a petition for review in the District of Columbia Court of Appeals.

(b)

Proceedings for judicial review of Mayoral actions shall be subject to and be in accordance with § 2-510.

History

Sept. 10, 1980, D.C. Law 3-86, § 509, 27 DCR 2975
Aug. 1, 1981, D.C. Law 4-27, § 2(i), 28 DCR 2824

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-1659.